Nevada, session 83, SB443-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.6. NRS 293.5842 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5842 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote in person during the period for early
voting, an elector must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place for early
voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as applicable, in
which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 3,] this section,
provide his or her [current] :
(1) Current and valid driver’s license or identification card
issued by [the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or
her physical address] this State or another state, the District of
Columbia or any territory of the United States as proof of the
elector’s identity and , if the driver’s license or identification card
was issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles and shows the
elector’s current residential address, as proof of the elector’s
identity and residency [.] ; or
(2) Tribal identification card as proof of the elector’s
identity and, if the tribal identification card shows the elector’s
current residential address, as proof of the elector’s identity and
residency.
3. If the elector’s driver’s license or identification card was
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles [to the elector] but
does not have the elector’s current residential address, an original,
electronic or certified copy of the following documents may be used
to establish the residency of the elector if the current residential
-
*SB443_R2*

– 4 –
address of the elector, as indicated on his or her application to
register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service [;] , that is dated not more than 60 days before
the date on which the elector is registering to vote;
(c) A bank or credit union statement [;] that is dated not more
than 60 days before the date on which the elector is registering to
vote;
(d) A paycheck [;] that is dated not more than 60 days before
the date on which the elector is registering to vote;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. [Subject] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or 6,
subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in person
at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot, unless it is
verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to register to vote
and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that polling place.
5. If an elector who appears to vote provides as proof of
identity a driver’s license or identification card that was not issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles or provides a tribal
identification card that does not have the elector’s current
residential address, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector; and
-
*SB443_R2*

– 5 –
(b) A statement informing the voter that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates residency must be provided to the county or city
clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday immediately following
election day and that failure to do so will result in the provisional
ballot not being counted.
6. If an elector who appears to vote does not have a driver’s
license or identification card issued by this State or another state,
the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States or a
tribal identification card, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector but has not been issued
a driver’s license or identification card by this State or another
state, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States
or a tribal identification card; and
(b) A statement informing the voter that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates proof of identity and residency must be provided
to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday
immediately following election day and failure to do so will result
in the provisional ballot not being counted.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an
elector’s provisional ballot that is cast pursuant to this section to
be counted unless the elector provides proof of identity and
residency as required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.5847 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5847 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person on the day of the election at
any polling place in the county or city, as applicable, in which the
elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote on the day of the election, an elector
must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place in the
county or city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
-
*SB443_R2*

– 6 –
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 3,] this section,
provide his or her [current] :
(1) Current and valid driver’s license or identification card
issued by [the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or
her physical address] this State or another state, the District of
Columbia or any territory of the United States as proof of the
elector’s identity , and if the driver’s license or identification card
was issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles and shows the
elector’s current residential address, as proof of the elector’s
identity and residency [.] ; or
(2) Tribal identification card as proof of the elector’s
identity and, if the tribal identification card shows the elector’s
current residential address, as proof of the elector’s identity and
residency.
3. If the elector’s driver’s license or identification card was
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles [to the elector] but
does not have the elector’s current residential address, an original,
electronic or certified copy of the following documents may be used
to establish the residency of the elector if the current residential
address of the elector, as indicated on his or her application to
register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service [;] , that is dated not more than 60 days before
the elector is registering to vote;
(c) A bank or credit union statement [;] that is dated not more
than 60 days before the elector is registering to vote;
(d) A paycheck [;] that is dated not more than 60 days before
the elector is registering to vote;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. [Subject] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or 6,
subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in person
at a polling place pursuant to this section:
-
*SB443_R2*

– 7 –
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot.
5. If an elector who appears to vote provides as proof of
identity a driver’s license or identification card that was not issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles or provides a tribal
identification card that does not have the elector’s current
residential address, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector; and
(b) A statement informing the voter that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates residency must be provided to the county or city
clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday immediately following
election day and that failure to do so will result in the provisional
ballot not being counted.
6. If an elector who appears to vote does not have a driver’s
license or identification card issued by this State or another state,
the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States or a
tribal identification card, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector but has not been issued
a driver’s license or identification card by this State or another
state, the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States
or a tribal identification card; and
(b) A statement informing the voter that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates proof of identity and residency must be provided
-
*SB443_R2*

– 8 –
to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday
immediately following election day and failure to do so will result
in the provisional ballot not being counted.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an
elector’s provisional ballot that is cast pursuant to this section to
be counted unless the elector provides proof of identity and
residency as required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 3. NRS 481.057 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.057 [In]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in a county
whose population is 100,000 or more, the Director may arrange for
offices of the Department to remain open on Saturdays and Sundays
and at hours other than 8 a.m. to 5 p.m.
2. In county whose population is 100,000 or more, the
Director shall arrange for the offices of the Department to remain
open on Saturdays and Sundays and at hours other than 8 a.m. to
5 p.m. for a person to apply only for the issuance or renewal of
any type of driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department:
(a) During the 2 weeks immediately preceding the last day to
register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 for a primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election; and
(b) During the 6 calendar days immediately following the day
of a primary election, presidential preference primary election or
general election.
3. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, the
Department shall not require a person to have an appointment for
the issuance or renewal of any type of driver’s license or
identification card issued by the Department:
(a) During the 2 weeks immediately preceding the last day to
register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 for a primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election; and
(b) During the 6 calendar days immediately following the day
of a primary election, presidential preference primary election or
general election.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “General election” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.060.
(b) “Presidential preference primary election” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 293.0771.
(c) “Primary election” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.080.
-
*SB443_R2*

– 9 –
Sec. 3.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Department of Motor Vehicles the sum of
$15,449 for the costs of additional security services for the extended
hours of operation required by NRS 481.057, as amended by section
3 of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2025, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 19, 2025, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State Highway
Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 3, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On May 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
3. Section 3.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2024.
H
-
*SB443_R2*